en: Non-roasted cashew nuts
fr: Noix de cajou non-grillées

en: Chestnuts
bg: Кестени
de: Maronen, Kastanien
es: Castañas
fi: kastanjat
fr: Châtaignes
hr: Kestenovi
it: Castagne
la: Castanea
lt: Kaštainiai
nl: Kastanjes
tr: Kestane
zh: 栗子

en: Fresh chestnuts
fr: Châtaignes fraîches

en: Shelled chestnuts, Chestnuts (shelled)
de: Maronen mit Schale, Ungeschälte Maronen
es: Castañas sin cáscara
fr: Châtaignes décortiquées
hr: Oljušteni kesteni
nl: Gepelde kastanjes, Kastanjes (gepeld)

en: Boiled Chestnuts, Chestnut cooked in water
fr: Châtaigne bouillie, Châtaigne cuite à l'eau

en: Grilled chestnut
fr: Châtaigne grillée

en: Canned chestnut
fr: Châtaigne en conserve, Châtaignes en conserve, Marrons en conserve

en: Chestnuts in syrup, Candied chestnuts in syrup
es: Castañas en almíbar
fr: Châtaignes au sirop, Marrons au sirop
hr: Kesteni u saftu
nl: Kastanjes op siroop

en: Hazelnuts
bg: Лешници
de: Haselnüsse
es: Avellanas
fi: hasselpähkinät
fr: Noisettes
hr: Lješnjaci
it: Nocciole
ja: ヘーゼルナッツ
la: Corylus avellana
lt: Lazdyno riešutai
nl: Hazelnoten
pt: Avelãs
sv: Hasselnötter, hasselnöt

en: Hazelnuts from Cervione
fr: Noisette de Cervione
it: Nuciola di Cervioni
nl: Hazelnoten uit Cervione

en: Hazelnuts from Reus
es: Avellana de Reus

en: Unshelled hazelnuts, Hazelnuts with shell
de: Ungeschälte Haselnüsse, Haselnüsse in der Schale
es: Avellanas con cáscara
fr: Noisettes non-décortiquées
it: Nocciole con guscio
nl: Hazelnoten (ongepeld)
pt: Avelãs com casca

en: Shelled hazelnuts
de: geschälte Haselnüsse
es: Avellanas sin cáscara
fi: kuorellisia hasselpähkinöitä
fr: Noisettes décortiquées
hr: Oljušteni lješnjaci
hu: Héjas mogyoró
it: Nocciole sin guscio
lt: Gliaudyti lazdyno riešutai
nl: Gepelde hazelnoten
pt: Avelãs sin casca
tr: Kabuklu fındık

en: Hazelnut powders, Hazelnuts powder
de: Haselnusspulver, gemahlene Hasselnüsse
fr: Noisettes en poudre
hr: Lješnjaci u prahu
lt: Lazdyno riešutų milteliai
nl: Hazelnootpoeders

en: Hazelnuts (whole)
de: Haselnusskerne
it: Nocciole in guscio
nl: hele hazelnoten

en: Shelled hazelnuts with skin
es: Avellanas sin cáscara crudas con piel
fr: Noisettes décortiquées non émondées
hr: Oljušteni lješnjaci s kožicom
hu: Hámozott nyers mogyoró bőrrel
lt: Gliaudyti lazdyno riešutai su odele
nl: Gepelde rauwe hazelnoten met velletje

en: Blanched shelled hazelnuts, Skinless shelled hazelnuts
es: Avellanas sin cáscara crudas sin piel, Avellanas sin cáscara crudas repeladas
fr: Noisettes décortiquées émondées
hr: Blanširanih oljuštenih lješnjaka
lt: Gliaudyti lazdyno riešutai be odelės
nl: Gepelde witte hazelnoten

en: Raw hazelnuts, Unroasted hazelnuts
fr: Noisettes décortiquées crues

en: Roasted hazelnuts
de: geröstete Haselnüsse
es: Avellanas tostadas
fi: Paahdetut hasselpähkinät
fr: Noisettes grillées
hr: Pečeni lješnjaci
it: Nocciole arrostite
lt: Kepinti lazdyno riešutai
nl: Gebrande hazelnoten
pt: Avelâs torradas, Miolo de avelã torrada

en: Roasted hazelnuts with skin
es: Avellanas tostadas con piel
fr: Noisettes grillées non émondées
hr: Pečeni lješnjaci s kožicom
lt: Kepinti lazdyno riešutai su odele
nl: Gebrande hazelnoten met velletje